Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-122.01
Adjutant General; military ceremonies and honors; duties; provide flag; when.

The Adjutant General shall conduct military ceremonies and honors in accordance with laws, regulations, or customs of the appropriate branch of the service. When an American flag is not provided by other sources, the Adjutant General shall provide an American flag for presentation during the funeral service honors ceremony for an active Nebraska National Guard member or for an honorably discharged Nebraska National Guard member who completed at least twenty years of service.

Laws 1991, LB 313, § 2.